Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RENOVATIONS AT UNITED STATES HOCKEY HALL OF FAME.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the United States Hockey Hall of Fame in Eveleth for renovations and for exhibit updates. new text end